Washington statutes.
RCW 15.130.510

Injunction.

(1) Regardless of the existence of other remedies at law, the department may bring an action to enjoin the violation of this chapter or the rules adopted under it in the superior court of Thurston county or in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(2) When the injunction concerns dissemination of false advertisement and the court determines that the injunction would delay the regular distribution of a printed issue of a newspaper, magazine, periodical, or other print publication, the court must exclude the issue from the scope of the injunction.

[ 2018 c 236 s 502.]